Wyoming, session 2025, HB0151.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-6-202(a)(i), (ii), (iv) and (v) is
amended to read:

11-6-202. Administration of districts by district
boards; number and qualifications of members; term; filling
of vacancies; removal.
HB0151

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0557

(a) The affairs of each district shall be
administered by a board of directors, each of whom shall be
a bona fide resident of Wyoming. Directors for the
positions identified in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this
subsection shall be elected at an annual meeting of
district livestock owners. Directors for the positions
identified in paragraphs (iv) and (v) of this subsection
shall be appointed as described. The composition of the
board shall be as follows:

(i) Three (3) directors shall be sheep owners
having paid predator management fees on sheep in the
district in the year preceding election. At each subsequent
annual district meeting one (1) director shall be elected
for a three (3) year term, and no director shall serve more
than nine (9) years. Subject to the provisions of W.S.
11-6-203(a), all sheep owners whether an individual,
corporation or partnership, having paid predator management
fees on sheep in the district regardless of the domicile of
the sheep, are entitled to one (1) vote at the meeting;

HB0151

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0557
(ii) Three (3) directors shall be cattle owners
having paid predator management fees on cattle in the
district in the year preceding election. At each subsequent
annual district meeting one (1) director shall be elected
for a three (3) year term, and no director shall serve more
than nine (9) years. Subject to the provisions of W.S.
11-6-203(a), all cattle owners whether an individual,
corporation or partnership, having paid predator management
fees on cattle in the district regardless of the domicile
of the cattle, are entitled to one (1) vote at the meeting;

(iv) The board of county commissioners shall
appoint one (1) director two (2) directors to serve for an
initial term of two (2) years and thereafter for three (3)
year terms from electors in the county not engaged in
raising sheep or cattle. No appointed member may director
shall serve for a consecutive period of more than six (6)
nine (9) years;

(v) If the board of directors determines state
funds are necessary for an effective predator management
program to assure the statutory requirements provided in
W.S. 11-6-205 are fulfilled and state funds are
HB0151

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0557
appropriated and received for that purpose, then three (3)
directors representing sportsmen and hunters from the
district shall be appointed to the board of directors by
the county commissioners serving the local district.
Sportsmen and hunter representatives shall be bona fide
residents of the district not engaged in raising sheep or
cattle and shall hold or have held a valid Wyoming fishing
or hunting license within the preceding twelve (12)
twenty-four (24) month period. County commissioners, to
the greatest extent practical, shall select sportsmen and
hunter representatives to ensure representation from as
broad a geographic distribution of the district as
possible. The county commissioners shall determine who of
the three (3) sportsmen and hunter directors appointed to a
board under this paragraph shall serve an initial term
terms of one (1) year, who shall serve an initial term of
(2) years and who thereafter shall serve a term for terms
of three (3) years. Thereafter, each term shall be for
three (3) No sportsman and hunter director shall serve for
a period of more than nine (9) years.

HB0151

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0557
Section 2. This act is effective January 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0151